New Jersey, session 221, A2600.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A resident taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from gross income fifty percent of the amount the taxpayer paid through E-ZPass, or other electronic toll collection systems, for New Jersey Turnpike Authority tolls. b.  For purposes of calculating the deduction, a taxpayer shall not include amounts: (1)   paid as a fine, penalty, or other payment made for a violation of a toll; (2)   paid as an administrative fee, processing fee, or other payment for the purpose of establishing an electronic toll collection system account, acquiring electronic toll collection system equipment, or other administrative purpose; (3)   reimbursed to the taxpayer by or for the taxpayers employer; (4) deductible in determining net profits from business pursuant to subsection b. of N.J.S.54A:5-1, even if not so deducted; (5)   deductible in determining distributive share of partnership income pursuant to subsection k. of N.J.S.54A:5-1, even if not so deducted; and (6)   deductible in determining net pro rata share of S corporation income pursuant to subsection p. of N.J.S.54A:5-1, even if not so deducted. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to taxable years beginning January 1 next following enactment.